Hawaii, session 2025, GM1266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that it is becoming
increasingly difficult to recruit and retain state employees.
Having affordable rental opportunities for state employees will
reduce the resignation and outmigration of state employees and
fill critical labor needs throughout state government.
The legislature further finds that with the city and county
of Honolulu's construction of an elevated rail transit system,
the State has an opportunity to enhance Oahu's urban environment
and increase the quality of life for residents by increasing the
affordable housing inventory and eliminating the need for
personal automobiles, among other public benefits. As the
largest landowner of transit-oriented development sites along
the transit line in the city and county of Honolulu, as well as
being the landowner of other transit-oriented development sites
in each of the other counties, the State and its various
departments and attached agencies must be proactive in
establishing a unified vision and approach toward redevelopment
2025-3448 HB1298 CDl HMSO
iiiNiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiii

Page 2 1298
H.B. NO
H.D. 3
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
of its transit-oriented development sites statewide to maximize
the benefits of state lands available for redevelopment.
The purpose of this Act is to establish within the Hawaii
housing finance and development corporation a government
employee housing program, to be financed by the dwelling unit
revolving fund.
SECTION 2. Chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and
to read as follows:
"PART GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEE HOUSING PROGRAM
§201H- Purpose. The purpose of this part is to
establish a government employee housing program to facilitate
the creation of affordable residential rental units for rent to
government employees and the general public on state-owned land.
§201H- Definitions. As used in this part, unless the
context otherwise requires:
"Mixed-use project" means a mixed-use development as
defined in section 201H-12(a).
"Project" means a specific work or improvement, including
real and personal properties, or any interest therein, acquired,
owned, constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated, or improved by
2025-3448 HB1298 CDl HMSO
iiiniiiiiiiiiiniM

Page 3 H.B. NO.
-3
C.D. 1
the corporation, including a commercial project, redevelopment
project, residential project, or mixed-use project.
"Transit-oriented development site" means non-ceded
state-owned lands within a one-mile radius of a planned or
existing station connected to a locally preferred alternative
for a mass transit project.
§201H- Government en^loyee housing program. (a) There
shall be established within the corporation the governmental
employee housing program for the purpose of providing affordable
and low-cost rental housing units for rent to government
employees and general public on state-owned land, to be financed
by the dwelling unit revolving fund established pursuant to
section 201H-191.
(b) The program shall be limited to one project on a
transit-oriented development site, which shall be selected by
the corporation.
§201H- Government employee housing projects; criteria,
(a) Government employee housing projects developed under this
part shall be intended primarily for government employees in the
following order of priority:
(1) Newly hired permanent full-time state employees;
2025-3448 HB1298 GDI HMSO
iiiiiiiiiiimiiiiiiBiiiig

Page 4 1298
H.B. NO
H.D. 3
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(2) Other permanent full-time state employees;
(3) Permanent full-time county employees;
(4) Permanent part-time state and county employees;
(5) Temporary state and county employees; and
(6) The general public.
(b) Sixty per cent of available units shall be for
government employees with incomes at or below one hundred forty
per cent of the median family income. For the purposes of this
part, the applicable median family income shall be the median
family income for the county or standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the project is located as determined
by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development, as adjusted from time to time.
(c) Should a state or county employee tenant occupying a
rental unit leave employment with the State or a county, the
tenant may continue to occupy the unit for up to twelve months.
§201H- Rules; guidelines. (a) Government employee
housing program project units on state land shall not be
advertised for rent, subleased, or used for any non-residential
use. The corporation, by rule, shall establish penalties for
violations of this subsection.
2025-3448 HB1298 GDI HMSO
IMIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIOII

Page 5 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
(b) The design and development contracts for residential
rental units on state land under this part shall not be subject
to chapter 103D.
§201H- Annual reports. The corporation shall submit an
annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session describing the projects
funded, a description of proposals submitted under this part and
action taken on the proposals, and any barriers to developing
housing units under this part. The annual report shall include
the feasibility of expanding the program and the demand for
residential rental projects developed under this part.
§201H- Additional powers. The powers conferred upon
the corporation by this part shall be in addition and
supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and
nothing in this part shall be construed as limiting any powers,
rights, privileges, or immunities so conferred.
§201H- Acquisition of real property from a county.
Notwithstanding the provision of any law or charter, any county,
by resolution of its county council, without public auction,
sealed bids, or public notice, may sell, lease, grant, or convey
to the corporation any real property owned by the county that
2025-3448 HB1298 CDl HMSO 5
lillllllMHiillllliMM

Page 6 1298
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
the corporation certifies to be necessary for the purposes of
this part. The sale, lease, grant, or conveyance shall be made
with or without consideration and upon terms and conditions as
may be agreed upon by the county and the corporation.
Certification shall be evidenced by a formal request from the
corporation. Before the sale, lease, grant, or conveyance is
made to the corporation, a public hearing shall be held by the
county council to consider the same. Notice of the hearing
shall be published at least six days before the date set for the
hearing in the publication and in the manner as may be
designated by the county council.
§201H- Condemnation of real property. The corporation,
upon making a finding that it is necessary to acquire any real
property for its immediate or future use for the purposes of
this part, may acquire the property, including property already
devoted to a public use, by condemnation pursuant to chapter
101. The property shall not thereafter be taken for any other
public use without the consent of the corporation. No award of
compensation shall be increased by reason of any increase in the
value of real property caused by the designation of the urban
redevelopment site or plan adopted pursuant to a designation, or
2025-3448 HB1298 CDl HMSO 6
llllillllllHIHIIIM

Page 7 H.B. NO.
-3
C.D. 1
the actual or proposed acquisition, use, or disposition of any
other real property by the corporation.
§201H- Lease of projects. Notwithstanding any law to
the contrary, the corporation, without recourse to chapter 103D,
may lease for a term not exceeding sixty-five years all or any
portion of the real or personal property constituting the
commercial portion of a mixed-use project to any person, upon
terms and conditions as may be approved by the corporation;
provided that all revenues generated from the lease shall be
used to support the purpose of this part.
§201H- Assistance by state and county agencies. Any
state or county agency, upon request of the corporation, may
render services for the purposes of this part,
§201H- Lands no longer needed. Lands acquired by the
corporation from another government agency that are no longer
needed by the corporation for the government employee housing
program shall be returned to the previous owner of those lands.
Lands acquired by the corporation from a private party that are
owned by the corporation and designated for the program but are
subsequently no longer needed for the program shall be retained
by the corporation.
2025-3448 HB1298 CDl HMSO
liiiniiiinMiniiiiniHi

Page 8 H.B. NO. 1298
H.D, 3
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
§201H- Rules. The corporation may adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of
this part."
SECTION 3. Section 201H-191, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§201H-191 Dwelling unit revolving fund. (a) There is
created a dwelling unit revolving fund. The funds appropriated
for the purpose of the dwelling unit revolving fund and all
moneys received or collected by the corporation for the purpose
of the revolving fund shall be deposited in the revolving fund.
The proceeds in the revolving fund shall be used [to rcimburoc]^.
(1) To reimburse the general fund to pay the interest on
general obligation bonds issued for the purposes of
the revolving fund[7—for- the]£
(2) For necessary expenses in administering housing
development programs regional state
infrastructure programs, and the government employee
housing program pursuant to part and [4©^^
carrying]
(3) To carry out the purposes of housing development
programs [a-nd]^ regional state infrastructure
2025-3448 HB1298 CDl HMSO
iiinniiiiiMiiiiiiini

Page 9 1298
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
programs, and the government employee housing program
pursuant to part including but not limited to the
expansion of community facilities and regional state
infrastructure constructed in conjunction with housing
and mixed-use transit-oriented development projects,
permanent primary or secondary financing, and
supplementing building costs, federal guarantees
required for operational losses, and all things
required by any federal agency in the construction and
receipt of federal funds or low-income housing tax
credits for housing projects.
(b) Subject to the requirements of subsection (a),
proceeds in the revolving fund may be used to [establish]
(1) Establish and operate regional state infrastructure
subaccounts pursuant to section 201H-191.5 [—]2 ar^
(2) Administer, implement, and finance the government
employee housing program pursuant part
SECTION 4. Section 302A-1603, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The following shall be exempt from this section:
2025-3448 HB1298 CDl HMSO
ininiaiiiiiiioiiiniii

Page 10 H.B. NO.
hTs
C.D. 1
(1) Any form of housing permanently excluding school-aged
children, with the necessary covenants or declarations
of restrictions recorded on the property;
(2) Any form of housing that is or will be paying the
transient accommodations tax under chapter 237D;
(3) All nonresidential development;
(4) Any development with an executed education
contribution agreement or other like document with the
agency for the contribution of school sites or payment
of fees for school land or school construction; [and
+] (5) [-}-] Any form of development by the Hawaii community
development authority pursuant to part XII of chapter
206E[—]; and
(6) Any form of development by the Hawaii housing finance
and development corporation pursuant to part of
chapter 2Q1H."
SECTION 6. There is appropriated out of the dwelling unit
revolving fund the sum of $200,000 or so much thereof as may be
necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
Hawaii housing finance and development corporation to:
2025-3448 HB1298 CDl HMSO 10
■■iHiiiiiiiMiniiiiii

Page 11 H.B. NO.
^0%
C.D. 1
(1) Adopt rules;
(2) Engage the community; and
(3) Conduct site and pre-development planning for one
government employee housing program project.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
housing finance and development corporation for the purposes of
this Act.
SECTION 7. There is appropriated out of the dwelling unit
revolving fund the sum of $160,000 or so much thereof as may be
necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position
within the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
housing finance and development corporation for the purposes of
this Act.
SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3448 HB1298 CDl HMSO 11

1298
H.B. NO
X
W
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 3rd day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1298, HD 3, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1298, H.D. 3, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai'i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
236